Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4056.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 39, chapter 1, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 39-130, to read: START_STATUTE39-130. Legislators; fees; exemption; electronic format A. Notwithstanding any other law, any legislator who makes a public records request in the legislator's official capacity may not be charged a fee and is not responsible for any cost related to the public records request. B. any Public records provided to a legislator who makes a public records request in the legislator's official capacity shall be made available to the legislator IN ANY FORMAT REQUESTED BY THE LEGISLATOR.END_STATUTE